Utah statutes.
72-2-116.   Gifts, bequests, and donations part of Transportation Fund -- Expenditure.

(1)  Gifts, bequests, and donations by individuals, corporations, or societies to the state for road building purposes shall become part of the Transportation Fund, and shall be expended for state highway purposes.

(2)  Gifts, bequests, or donations made to any county shall be expended under the direction of the county legislative body.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

